test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_A_STEM_3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲íiya - ENGLISH : # CLASS_A_STEM_3

     k̲íiya+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲íiyaa
     k̲íiya+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íiyaa
     k̲íiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íiyaa
     k̲íiya+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íiyaang
     k̲íiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íiyaayaa
     k̲íiya+V+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲íiyaayaan
     k̲íiya+V+RELATIVE: k̲íiyaas
     k̲íiya+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲íiyaayaas
     k̲íiya+V+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyaayaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲íiyaaäsaa
     k̲íiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲íiyaaäs
     k̲íiya+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲íiyaaäsaang
     k̲íiya+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲íiyaaäsga
     k̲íiya+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íiyaaäsaas
     k̲íiya+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íiyaaäsaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyaa.ang k̲asa'áa
     k̲íiya+V+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyaa.ang k̲asa'áang
     k̲íiya+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲íiya+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲íiya+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íiyaa'uuj
     k̲íiya+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íiyaa'uujang
     k̲íiya+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲íiyaaäsaa'uujang
     k̲íiya+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲íiyaa'us
     k̲íiya+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íiyaa'ujaa
     k̲íiya+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyaa'uujaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íiyaaäsaa'us
     k̲íiya+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲íiyaa'ahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲íiyaa'ahlanggan
     k̲íiya+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íiyaa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲íiya+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲íiyaaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲íiya+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲íiyaa'ahlans
     k̲íiya+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲íiyaayaa'ahlang
     k̲íiya+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲íiyaayaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲íiya+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲íiyaayaa'ahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+REFLEXIVE: k̲íiyaa'ahl
     k̲íiya+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲íiyaaäseehl
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyaa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyaa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyaa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲íiya+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íiyaa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
